en: Mustard seeds
bg: Синапено семе
fr: Graines de moutarde
hr: Sjemenke gorušice

en: Papaver seeds, Papaver, Poppy seeds
bg: Маково семе
fr: Graines de pavot, Pavot
hr: Sjemenke papavera
ja: ケシの実, 芥子の実, ポピーシード
nl: Maanzaad

en: Lotus seeds
fr: Graines de lotus

en: Sweeteners
bg: Подсладители
ca: Edulcorants
da: Sødemidler
de: Süßstoffe
es: Endulzantes, Edulcorantes
fi: makeutusaineet
fr: Édulcorants
he: ממתיקים
hr: Sladila
hu: Édesítőszerek
it: Edulcoranti, dolcificanti
ja: 甘味料
nl: Zoetstoffen
pl: Produkty wykorzystywane do słodzenia, słodzące
pt: Adoçantes
ru: Подсластители и заменители сахара
sv: Sötningsmedel
th: ใช้น้ำตาลเทียม
tr: Tatlandırıcı, Tatlandırıcılar
zh: 糖精

en: Sweetener variety packs
de: Süßstoffemischpackungen
es: Paquetes variados de endulzantes
fr: Assortiments de édulcorants
hr: Pakiranja raznih zaslađivača
it: Confezioni miste di zucchero e dolcificanti
nl: Zoetstoffenassortimenten
pt: Packs variados de adoçantes

en: Sugars
bg: Захар
ca: Sucre
cs: Cukr
da: Sukre, Sukkere, Sukker
de: Zucker
es: Azúcar
fi: Sokerit
fr: Sucres, sucre
hr: šečeri, šečer
hu: Cukrok
it: Zucchero
ja: 砂糖
nb: Sukker, Sukkere
nl: Suiker
nn: Sukker
pl: Cukier
pt: Açucar
ru: Сахар, сахара
sv: Socker
tr: Şeker
zh: 糖类

en: Brown sugars, Brown sugar
bg: Кафява захар
da: Brune sukre, Brunt sukker
de: braune Zucker
es: Azúcar moreno
fi: fariinisokerit
fr: Sucres roux, sucre roux
hr: Smeđi šećeri
it: Zucchero grezzo
ja: ブラウンシュガー
nb: Brunsukker, Brunsukkere
nl: Bruine suikers
nn: Brunsukker
sv: Brunt socker

en: Cotton candy sugars
de: Zuckerwattezucker
es: Azúcares para algodón de azúcar
fr: Sucres pour barbes à papa
hr: Šećerna vuna šećeri
nl: Suikers voor suikerspin

en: Beet sugars, beetroot sugars
da: Roesukre, Roesukker
fr: Sucres de betterave, sucre de betterave
hr: Šećeri od repe
ja: てんさい糖
nb: Betesukker, Betesukkere
nl: Bietsuikers, Bietsuiker
nn: Betesukker
sv: Betsocker

en: Maple sugars
da: Lønsukre, Lønsukker
fr: Sucres d'érable
hr: Javorovi šećeri
ja: メープルシュガー
nl: Ahornsiroop
sv: Lönnsocker

fr: vergeoises, vergeoise
nl: Basterdsuikers

en: Muscovado
es: Azúcar mascabado
fr: Sucre muscovado
hr: Muscovado
ja: 黒砂糖
nl: Basterdsuiker, Basterdsuicker, Basterdsuijcker, Basterdsuijker, Basterd, Bastardsuiker, Bastardsuicker, Bastardsuijcker, Bastardsuijker, Bastard, Bastert, Bastertsuiker

en: Panela
es: Panela
fr: Panela
hr: Panela

en: Panela blocks
es: Panela en bloque

en: Powdered panela
es: Panela en polvo
fr: Panela en poudre
hr: Panela u prahu

en: Palm sugars
da: Palmesukre, Palmesukker
de: Palmzucker
fr: Sucres de palme, sucre de palme
nb: Palmesukker, Palmesukkere
nn: Palmesukker
sv: Palmsocker

hr: Kampong speu palmin šećer
en: Kampong Speu Palm Sugar
fr: Sucre de Palme de Kampong Speu
km: ស្ករត្នោតកំពង់ស្ពឺ

en: Cane sugars, Cane sugar
bg: Тръстикова захар
da: Rørsukre, Rørsukker
de: Rohrzucker
es: Azúcar de caña
fi: Ruokosokeri
fr: Sucres de canne
hr: Šećerna trska
it: Zucchero di canna
ja: きび砂糖
nb: Rørsukker, Rørsukkere
nl: Rietsuikers
nn: Røyrsukker
pt: Açúcar de cana
ru: Тростниковый сахар
sv: Rörsocker

en: Coconut sugar
bg: Кокосова захар
da: Kokossukre, Kokossukker
de: Kokoszucker
es: Azúcar de coco
fi: kookossokeri
fr: Sucres de coco, sucres de fleur de coco
hr: Kokosov šećer
it: Zucchero di cocco, Zucchero di coco
nl: Kokossuiker
pt: Açúcar de coco
sv: Kokossocker

en: Inverted sugar syrups, inverted sugar, inverted liquid sugar
es: Azúcar invertido
fi: Inverttisokerisiirapit, Inverttisokeri
fr: sucres invertis, sucres liquides invertis, sirops de sucre inverti
hr: Sirupi od invertnog šećera
it: Zucchero invertito
ja: 転化糖
nl: Invertsuikersiroop